Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.160

Verdict—New trial—Continuance—New summons.

Upon the return of the verdict the proceedings of the court regarding new trial and the entry of judgment thereon shall be the same as in other civil actions, and the judgment shall be such as the nature of the case shall require. The court shall continue or adjourn the case from time to time as to all occupants and owners named in such petition who shall not have been served with process or brought in by publication, and new summons may issue or new publication may be made at any time; and upon such occupants or owners being brought in, the court may impanel a jury to ascertain the compensation so to be made to such defendant or defendants for private property taken or damaged, and like proceedings shall be had for such purpose as herein provided.

[ 1907 c 153 s 12; RRS s 9226. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 11; 1893 c 84 s 11.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 17 through 25, 54, 59.

Entry of judgment, civil actions: Chapter 4.64 RCW.

New trials, civil actions: Chapter 4.76 RCW.